Utah statutes.
41-6a-706.5.   Operation of motor vehicle near bicycle prohibited.
An operator of a motor vehicle may not knowingly, intentionally, or recklessly
operate a motor vehicle within three feet of a moving bicycle, unless the
operator of the motor vehicle operates the motor vehicle within a reasonable
and safe distance of the bicycle.
